Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-123.06
Boat license; rights of licensee.

A boat license shall allow the sale of alcoholic liquor in individual drinks, on any passenger boat which maintains a public dining room or restaurant thereon.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 25, p. 390;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-325;

R.S.1943, § 53-123;

Laws 1947, c. 187, § 1(6), p. 618;

Laws 1947, c. 188, § 1(6), p. 623.